Mississippi, session 2026, SB3340.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to Yalobusha County for the purpose of defraying costs associated with certain infrastructure projects for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.. $ 1,975,000.00. SECTION 2.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Section 1 of this act, the following amounts are to be allocated as follows: To defray costs of improvements to and purchase of equipment for the Velma Volunteer Fire Department..................... $ 25,000.00. To defray costs of construction of a new 911 call center and emergency management center........................ $ 750,000.00. To defray costs of debris clean up after Winter Storm Fern............................................ $ 1,200,000.00. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.